Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.060

Director of commission—Appointment—Salary.

The governor as chair of the commission shall appoint a person to be director of the Washington traffic safety commission which director shall be paid such salary as shall be deemed reasonable and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5143; 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 7.]